test/src/morphology/Pron-taemaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - tämā ~ ta: # pronouns 5 'eng /est tema/fin' - full paradigm
     tämā+Pron+Sg+Nom: [tämā, ta]
     tämā+Pron+Sg+Gen: täʼm
     tämā+Pron+Sg+Par: tǟnda
     tämā+Pron+Sg+Dat: täʼmmõn
     tämā+Pron+Sg+Ins: täʼmkõks
     tämā+Pron+Sg+Ill: [täʼmmõ, täʼmmõz]
     tämā+Pron+Sg+Ela: täʼmstõ
